New Jersey, session 221, ACR20.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of New Jersey". 6.    The Secretary of State shall cause an enactment directing fiscal restraint proposed by an initiative petition to be submitted to the people to be published at least once in one or more newspapers of each county, if any newspaper be published therein, not less than 90 days prior to that submission to the people. 7.    (a)  If conflicting enactments directing fiscal restraint in response to initiative petitions and submitted to the voters, are approved at the same election by a majority of the total number of votes cast for and against the same, only the one receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall be deemed enacted. (b)   If there are submitted to the people at the same election  enactments directing fiscal restraint proposed by referendum petitions effecting the repeal of an existing law in its entirety and sections or parts of the same law, or laws enacted by the Legislature and the Governor in response to those referendum petitions, and those enactments directing fiscal restraint shall each receive a majority of the votes cast thereon, only the one receiving the greatest number of affirmative votes shall be deemed enacted. 8.    No enactments directing fiscal restraint proposed by an initiative and referendum petition and approved by the people shall be subject to the veto power of the Governor. 9.    The filing of an initiative and referendum petition with respect to any law or section or part thereof shall in no way affect the effective date or the implementation of the law. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as preventing from being submitted to the people at the same election: (a)   A referendum question with respect to a law in its entirety and a referendum question with respect to any section or part of the same law; or (b)   Two or more referendum questions with respect to different sections or parts of the same law. 2.    When this proposed amendment to the Constitution is finally agreed to pursuant to Article IX, paragraph 1 of the Constitution, it shall be submitted to the people at the next general election occurring more than three months after the final agreement and shall be published at least once in at least one newspaper of each county designated by the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly and Secretary of State, not less than three months prior to the general election. 3.    This proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be submitted to the people at that election in the following manner and form: There shall be printed on each official ballot to be used at the general election, the following: a.     In every municipality in which voting machines are not used, a legend which shall immediately precede the question as follows: If you favor the proposition printed below make a cross (X), plus (+), or check (a) in the square opposite the word "Yes." If you are opposed thereto make a cross (X), plus (+) or check (a) in the square opposite the word "No." b.    In every municipality the following question: ESTABLISHES AN INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM PROCESS FOR DIRECT VOTER ENACTMENT OF STATE FISCAL RESTRAINTS YES Shall the amendment to Article I, paragraph 2 and Article II of the Constitution, agreed to by the Legislature, establishing the process of initiative and referendum for direct voter enactment of State fiscal restraints, be adopted? INTERPRETIVE STATEMENT NO Adoption of this amendment will establish a direct initiative and referendum process in this State whereby State voters will be able to directly enact laws by majority voter approval through State general election public questions in five specific categories imposing fiscal restraints upon the State Government.  Those five categories are: (1) reduction of up to 10 percent of total State appropriations, (2) elimination of specific items of State appropriation, (3) reduction of up to 10 percent of total anticipated State revenue from taxes and all other sources, (4) repeal of any State tax law, and (5) a one year suspension of the issuance any long-term debt by any State statutory entity which debt was not approved by the voters.  The Legislature will be able to negate a voter-enacted fiscal restraint only by a recorded two-thirds majority vote of all members of both houses within 45 days of voter approval.  The Governor is directed when necessary to implement voter enacted fiscal restraints.  A statewide referendum petition will be submitted to the voters if it contains voter signatures in each of at least 14 counties equal to at least 25% of the votes cast for the last gubernatorial election.  A petition proposing a voter enactment directing fiscal restraint may contain more than one such enactment, but must allow for a separate and distinct public question to be voted on for each such enactment. STATEMENT This concurrent resolution proposes to amend the State Constitution to provide the people of New Jersey with the power of direct initiative and referendum to enact and repeal laws governing certain forms of State spending, appropriations and taxation as well as the issuance of long-term public debt. This constitutional amendment provides the people of New Jersey with the ability to directly enact and repeal laws by majority voter approval through State general election public questions in five specific categories. Focused on imposing greater fiscal restraints on State government, the five categories, include:  (1) reduction of up to 10 percent of total State appropriations, (2) elimination of specific items of State appropriation, (3) reduction of up to 10 percent of total anticipated State revenue from taxes and all other sources, (4) repeal of any State tax law, and (5) a one year suspension of the issuance of any long-term debt by any State statutory entity which debt was not approved by the voters.  Under the provisions of the resolution, the Legislature may negate a direct enactment through a recorded two-thirds majority vote of all members in both Houses within 45 days of voter approval.  When mandated by a direct vote of the people, the Governor is authorized to implement the provisions of voter enacted fiscal restraints. A statewide referendum petition will be submitted to the voters if it contains voter signatures in each of at least 14 counties equal to at least 25% of the votes cast for the last gubernatorial election.  A limit on the time allowed for collecting the required number of signatures may be established by law, but the limitation cannot be less than one year.  A petition proposing a voter enactment directing fiscal restraint may contain more than one such proposed enactment, but it must allow for a separate and distinct public question to be voted on for each such enactment. Before a petition can be submitted to the voters at a general election, it is to be filed with the Secretary of State, who is to have 60 days to determine whether the petition was signed by a sufficient number of registered voters.  The Secretary of State is authorized to make a determination on the basis of a sample of the signatures, chosen in accordance with appropriate random sampling techniques. If, on or before the 30th day after the filing, the Secretary of State determines that a sufficient number of signatures have not been obtained, the petition is deemed void and without effect.  Otherwise, the petition is deemed eligible for submission to the voters at a general election. This constitutional amendment provides that prior to the submission to the voters of a proposed enactment, any party may seek a declaratory judgment from the New Jersey Supreme Court that the proposed enactment would be invalid under the Constitution or laws of the United States. If a law proposed by initiative or referendum petition and submitted to the people is not approved, or a law whose continuance is the subject of a public question submitted to the people in a referendum is not rejected, then neither that law nor public question, or one to effect the same or substantially the same change, may be submitted to the people for approval or rejection, before the third general election thereafter. The constitutional amendment also provides that no law proposed by an initiative or referendum petition and approved by the people may be subject to the veto power of the Governor.  It also provides that if conflicting laws proposed by the initiative process are approved by the people at the same election, the one receiving the highest number of affirmative votes will be approved.